Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2570.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 106
USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE BY HEALTHCARE PROVIDERS NOTIFICATION
ACT
23-106-1. Short title and purpose.
(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Use of Artificial Intelligence by
Healthcare Providers Notification Act".
(b) The purpose of this chapter is to ensure patients are properly notified of the use of
artificial intelligence by healthcare providers.
23-106-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Artificial Intelligence" or "AI" means any technology that can simulate human
intelligence including, but not limited to, natural language processing, training language models,
reinforcement learning from human feedback and machine learning systems.
(2) "Healthcare facility" shall have the same meaning as § 23-17-2.
(3) "Healthcare provider" means physicians, physician assistants, dentists, registered
nurses, licensed practical nurses, advanced practice registered nurses, nursing assistants, or any

other healthcare professional licensed by the director of the department of health.
23-106-3. Notifications required.
Any and all healthcare providers and healthcare facilities that employ artificial intelligence
("AI") to document in-person or telehealth visits shall notify patients of the use of AI for that sole
purpose and review the AI-generated documentation for accuracy after the visit.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004719/SUB A
========
LC004719/SUB A - Page 2 of 3